pr11.dix
<pardef n="ava/nu_pn">
        <e><p>
                <l>nu</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ru</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>nannu</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>rannu</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>niMxa</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>riMxa</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>nigeV</l>
				<r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>nigAgi</l>
				<r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>nigoskara</l>
				<r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>rigeV</l>
				<r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>rigAgi</l>
				<r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>rigoskara</l>
				<r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
                <l>na deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>niMxa</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>ra deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>riMxa</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>na</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>ra</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>nalli</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>ralli</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>ne</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>re</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="iva/nu_pn">
        <e><p>
                <l>nu</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ru</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>nannu</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>rannu</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>niMxa</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>riMxa</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>nigeV</l>
				<r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>nigAgi</l>
				<r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>nigoskara</l>
				<r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>rigeV</l>
				<r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>rigAgi</l>
				<r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>rigoskara</l>
				<r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>				
		
		<e><p>
                <l>na deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>niMxa</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>ra deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>riMxa</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>na</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>ra</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>nalli</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>ralli</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>ne</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>re</l>
                <r>nu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="avanu"><i>ava</i><par n="ava/nu_pn"/></e>
<e lm="ivanu"><i>iva</i><par n="iva/nu_pn"/></e>
